District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.05

Monitoring for compliance with subchapter.

(a)

The Mayor shall ensure that all monitoring for compliance under this subchapter acquires accurate data and forms the basis for valid and reliable determinations.

(b)

Monitoring for compliance as a condition for a permit under this subchapter shall comply with a quality assurance plan approved by the Mayor.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 6, 32 DCR 919

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-925.